Montana, session 2025, SB345.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Evidentiary standard. (1)Opinions of the treating physician are not
entitled to deference.
(2) Testimony of a health care professional must be weighed based on the individual's education,
training, experience, expertise in the medical field in question, EXTENT OF INTERACTIONS WITH OR TREATMENT OF
THE EMPLOYEE WITH REGARD TO THE MEDICAL CONDITION, and credibility.
(3) Discovery related to an independent medical examiner is limited to the provider's training,
educational background, the number of independent medical exams performed each year, the number of
independent medical exams for the particular insurer named as a respondent, and payments received from the
particular insurer named as the respondent.

Section 2. Section 39-71-605, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-71-605. Examination of employee by physician -- effect of refusal to submit to examination
-- report and testimony of physician -- cost. (1) (a) Whenever in case of injury the right to compensation
under this chapter would exist in favor of any employee, the employee shall, upon on the written request of the
insurer, submit from time to time to examination by a physician, psychologist, or panel that must be provided
and paid for by the insurer and shall likewise submit to examination from time to time by any physician,
psychologist, or panel selected by the department or as ordered by the workers' compensation judge.

- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 345

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0345.2
(b) The request or order for an examination must fix a time and place for the examination, with
regard for the employee's convenience, physical condition, and ability to attend at the time and place that is as
close to the employee's residence as is practical. AND ABILITY TO ATTEND AT THE DESIGNATED TIME. An
examination that is conducted by a physician, psychologist, or panel licensed in another state is not precluded
under this section. The employee is entitled to have a physician present at any examination. If the employee,
after written request, fails or refuses to submit to the examination or in any way obstructs the examination, the
employee's right to compensation must be suspended and is subject to the provisions of 39-71-607. Any
physician, psychologist, or panel employed by the insurer or the department who makes or is present at any
examination may be required to testify as to the results of the examination.
(2) In the event of a dispute concerning the physical condition of a claimant or the cause or causes
of the injury or disability, if any, the department or the workers' compensation judge, at the request of the
claimant or insurer, as the case may be, shall require the claimant to submit to an examination as it considers
desirable by a physician, psychologist, or panel within the state or elsewhere that has had adequate and
substantial experience in the particular field of medicine concerned with the matters presented by the dispute.
The physician, psychologist, or panel making the examination shall file a written report of findings with the
claimant and insurer for their use in the determination of the controversy involved. The requesting party shall
pay the physician, psychologist, or panel for the examination.
(3) As used in this section, a panel includes a practitioner having substantial experience in the field
of medicine concerned with the matters presented by the dispute and whose licensure would qualify the
practitioner to act as a treating physician, as defined in 39-71-116, and may include a psychologist.
(4) If a claimant submits to an examination under subsection (1) or (2) at the request of the insurer,
the insurer shall pay the following reasonable expenses incurred due to attendance at the examination:
(a) travel, lodging, and meals;
(b) child care and pet care; and
(c) compensation for loss of wages, not to exceed the claimant's compensation benefit rate under
39-71-701.
(5) THE EXPENSES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTIONS (4)(B) AND (4)(C) DO NOT CONSTITUTE REIMBURSABLE
EXPENSES UNDER 39-71-704(1)(D)(I)
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 345

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB0345.2
(4)(5) (6) A claimant is required, upon on a written request of an insurer, to submit to a functional
capacities evaluation conducted by a licensed physical or occupational therapist."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 39, chapter 71, and the provisions of Title 39, chapter 71, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 345